Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB244.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 204 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a clause to read:Section 204. Exclusions from Tax.--The tax imposed by section 202 shall not be imposed upon any of the following:* * *(77) The sale at retail or use of an alternative fuel vehicle or hybrid vehicle, during the calendar years 2026 and 2027. The following apply:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (i) The Secretary of Environmental Protection shall certify to the State Treasurer the make and model of motor vehicles that are eligible for the exemption provided under this clause.(ii) For the purposes of this clause, the phrases "alternative fuel vehicle" and "hybrid vehicle" are as defined in section 2 of the act of November 29, 2004 (P.L.1376, No.178), known as the "Alternative Fuels Incentive Act."Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0244PN0162 - 2 - 12345678